Arkansas, session 2025, HB1266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Henderson State University for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Chancellor, Henderson State Univ. 1 $322,307
(2) Vice Chancellor 4 $215,850
(3) Project/Program Administrator 38
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
*HAR026*
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(4) Dean of School 4 $206,009
(5) IT Pool 8
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(6) Associate Vice Chancellor 5 $194,084
(7) Exec. Assistant to the President 1 $188,485
(8) Dir. of Computer/Comms. Svcs. 1 $180,915
(9) Controller 1 $166,632
(10) Director of Counseling 1 $154,831
(11) Director of Retention 1 $152,582
(12) Dean of Student Services 1 $140,536
(13) Associate Director of Comp./Comms. Svcs. 1 $138,524
(14) Director of Planning and Research 1 $136,149
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
(15) Director of Student Aid 1 $135,442
(16) Counselor 3 $127,507
(17) Assoc. Dean of Student Services 4 $126,291
(18) Director of Testing 1 $114,689
(19) Director of Alumni 1 $108,903
(20) Director of Publications/Creative Svcs. 1 $108,375
(21) Director of Instructional Technology 1 $106,742
(22) Assistant Dean of Student Services 5 $103,601
(23) Major Gift Devel. Officer 1 $103,600
(24) Fiscal Support Pool 10
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(25) Aircraft Maintenance Coordinator 1 $91,298
(26) Public Safety Pool 10
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(27) Institutional Assistant 10 $89,980
(28) Skilled Trades Pool 1
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(29) Aviation Technician 2 $72,774
(30) HEI Program Coordinator 4 $69,975
(31) Administrative Support Pool 35
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(32) Financial Aid Analyst 4 $67,284
(33) Library Support Pool 6
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(34) Payroll Services Specialist 2 $67,284
(35) Purchasing Specialist 2 $67,284
(36) Career Planning & Placement Specialist 1 $64,696
(37) Financial Aid Specialist 2 $62,208
(38) Human Resources Specialist 1 $62,208
(39) Student Recruitment Specialist 1 $62,208
(40) Purchasing Technician 1 $59,815
(41) Cashier 2 $51,130
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(42) Faculty 8
Professor $197,881
Assoc. Professor $184,186
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
Asst. Professor $156,658
Instructor $128,780
(43) Department Chairperson 5 $192,886
(44) Director of Library 1 $183,591
(45) Director of Aviation 1 $139,246
(46) Director of Bands 1 $139,246
(47) Director of Honors College 1 $139,246
(48) Library Faculty 6
Associate Librarian $132,579
Assistant Librarian $110,077
(49) Chief Flight Instructor 1 $109,683
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(50) Faculty 156
Distinguished Professor $212,394
Professor $186,327
Assoc. Professor $163,351
Asst. Professor $136,757
Instructor $106,699
Lecturer $89,546
(51) Part-Time Faculty 85 $56,046
(52) Graduate Assistant 65 $33,667
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(53) Project/Program Administrator 8
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(54) Director of Athletics 1 $159,847
(55) Coach 10 $146,047
(56) Assistant Director of Athletics 1 $122,713
(57) Assistant Coach 12 $114,807
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
(58) Head Athletic Trainer 1 $114,807
(59) Administrative Support Pool 6
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
(60) Asst. Athletic Trainer 3 $60,620
(61) Resident Hall Specialist 2 $57,515
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 555

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Henderson State University for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: five
hundred (500) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay
not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation
Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Henderson State University, to be payable from the
Henderson State University Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Henderson State University for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $11,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 40,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,000,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 7,098,256
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 400,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) FUNDED DEPRECIATION 200,000
(06) COMMUNITY EDUCATION CENTER 85,186
(07) CONTINGENCY 1,086,913
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $22,910,355

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Henderson State University, to be payable from cash funds as defined
by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Henderson State University for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $15,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,000,000
(03) OVERTIME 100,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 3,000,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 19,800,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,000,000
(C) PROF. FEES 3,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 3,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 20,000,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 10,000,000
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 2,000,000
(09) FUNDED DEPRECIATION 200,000
(10) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 200,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $79,300,000

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FISCAL
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
YEAR 2020 BUDGET STABILIZATION LOAN REPAYMENT.
(a) It is the intent of this section to provide for the repayment by
Henderson State University of a loan received from the Budget Stabilization
Trust Fund in fiscal year 2020.
(b) As repayment for the outstanding loan received from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund in fiscal year 2020, Henderson State University
shall make payments of nine hundred fifty-eight thousand three hundred
thirty-three dollars and thirty-three cents ($958,333.33) from any legal fund
of Henderson State University to the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund on the
following dates unless modifications are made under subsection (d) of this
section:
(1) December 1, 20245;
(2) December 1, 20256;
(3) December 1, 20267;
(4) December 1, 20278;
(5) December 1, 20289; and
(6) December 1, 202930.
(c) Henderson State University shall provide a report to the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in regular, fiscal, or
extraordinary session, the Joint Budget Committee, no later than June 30 of
each year regarding the status of the loan received from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund.
(d)(1) Loan payments under subsection (b) of this section may be
modified by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in
regular, fiscal, or extraordinary session, the Joint Budget Committee, based
upon its review of the status of the loan received from the Budget
Stabilization Trust Fund.
(2) A modification to a loan payment under subdivision (2)(A) of
this section may include without limitation:
(A) The amount of one (1) or more loan payments; and
(B) The timing of one (1) or more loan payments.
(e) This section shall expire upon the final payment by Henderson
State University to the Budget Stabilization Trust Fund under subsection (b)
of this section.

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026

HB1266
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






01/27/2025 1:37:24 PM HAR026